Utah statutes.
53-7-107.   Electronic writing.

(1)  Any writing required or permitted by this chapter may be filed or prepared in an electronic medium and by electronic transmission subject to the ability of the recipient to accept and process the electronic writing.

(2)  Any writing required by this chapter to be signed that is in an electronic medium shall be signed by electronic signature in accordance with Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.



Amended by Chapter 21, 2006 General Session

